Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Rights.

Sec. 47.80.010.
Rights of persons with disabilities.

Persons with disabilities have the same legal rights and responsibilities guaranteed all other persons by the Constitution of the United States and federal laws and by the constitution and laws of the state. An otherwise qualified person may not be excluded, by reason of having a disability, from participation in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination under, any program or activity that receives public funds. Some persons with disabilities may be unable, due to the severity of their disability, to exercise for themselves all of their rights in a meaningful way; for others modification of some or all of their rights is appropriate. The procedure used for modification of rights must contain proper legal safeguards against every form of abuse, must be based on an evaluation of the social capability of the person by qualified experts, and must be subject to periodic reviews and to the right of appeal to higher authorities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 24 ch 25 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, substituted “disabilities” for “handicaps” and “disability” for “handicap” throughout the section.

Sec. 47.80.020.
Protection and advocacy of rights.

The department shall establish a system to protect and advocate rights of persons with disabilities. The system

has the authority to pursue legal, administrative, and other appropriate remedies to assure the protection of the rights of persons with disabilities; and

shall be independent of any state agency that provides treatment, services, or habilitation of persons with disabilities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 25 ch 25 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, substituted “disabilities” for “handicaps” throughout the section.